Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3611
Map; change or amendment; procedure.

(1) After the adoption of the map designating and delineating areas of future growth and development of the cities and villages in the county by the county board as provided in section 23-3610, the map shall not be changed or amended except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

(2) When the county board is notified that the area over which a city or village formally exercises jurisdiction for purposes of zoning or platting has been extended so as to include a portion of the area of future growth and development of another city or village, the board shall promptly amend the map so as to place the territory that is in the jurisdiction of the city or village for zoning or platting purposes within the area of future growth and development of the same city or village.

(3) Upon the request of a city or village which recites that changes in growth and development patterns or population and economic trends have necessitated changes in the map of areas of growth and development, the county board shall review the territories specified in the request as requiring reallocation and make such changes as it deems warranted. The review shall be carried out in the same manner as prescribed in sections 23-3609 and 23-3610 for dealing with disputed territory, and any changes made by the county board shall be based on the same criteria as used by the board in making its original determination.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 11.